Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201384-908
Rule or regulation;
adoption; amendment; repeal; considerations; when effective; approval by Governor; filing.

(1) No
adoption, amendment, or repeal of any rule or regulation shall become effective
until the same has been approved by the Governor and filed with the Secretary
of State after a hearing has been set on such rule or regulation pursuant
to section 84-907. When determining whether to approve the adoption, amendment,
or repeal of any rule or regulation relating to an issue of unique interest
to a specific geographic area, the Governor's considerations shall include,
but not be limited to: (a) Whether adequate notice
of hearing was provided in the geographic area affected by the rule or regulation.
Adequate notice shall include, but not be limited to, the availability of
copies of the rule or regulation at the time notice was given pursuant to
section 84-907; and (b) whether reasonable and
convenient opportunity for public comment was provided for the geographic
area affected by the rule or regulation. If a public hearing was not held
in the affected geographic area, reasons shall be provided by the agency to
the Governor. Any rule or regulation properly adopted by any agency shall
be filed with the Secretary of State.

(2) No agency
shall utilize, enforce, or attempt to enforce any rule or regulation or proposed
rule or regulation unless the rule, regulation, or proposed rule or regulation
has been approved by the Governor and filed with the Secretary of State after
a hearing pursuant to section 84-907.

Laws 1953, c. 359, § 2, p. 1138;

Laws 1972, LB 373, § 1;

Laws 1974, LB 604, § 4;

Laws 1975, LB 316, § 1;

Laws 1978, LB 44, § 10;

Laws 1986, LB 992, § 10;

Laws 1987, LB 253, § 10;

Laws 1987, LB 189, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB242, § 3.
September 6, 2013
Rate tariffs, and any rules of interpretation thereof, are excepted from requirements of filing with Secretary of State. City of Scottsbluff v. United Telephone Co. of the West, 171 Neb. 229, 106 N.W.2d 12 (1960).